trunk/apertium-sv-da/apertium-sv-da.da.dix
    <pardef n="f/inde__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ind</l>
          <r>inde<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inde</l>
          <r>inde<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inder</l>
          <r>inde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>andt</l>
          <r>inde<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>undet</l>
          <r>inde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="skr/ige__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ig</l>
          <r>ige<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ige</l>
          <r>ige<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iger</l>
          <r>ige<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iges</l>
          <r>ige<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eg</l>
          <r>ige<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eget</l>
          <r>ige<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="skil/le__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>le</l>
          <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__voice"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ler</l>
          <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>les</l>
          <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lede</l>
          <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__voice"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Modal verbs -->

    <pardef n="k/unne__vbmod">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>unne</l>
          <r>unne<s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf"/><s n="actv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>an</l>
          <r>unne<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>unne</l>
          <r>unne<s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/><s n="actv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>unnet</l>
          <r>unne<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="sk/ulle__vbmod">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ulle</l>
          <r>ulle<s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>al</l>
          <r>ulle<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ulle</l>
          <r>ulle<s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ullet</l>
          <r>ulle<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="vil/le__vbmod">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>le</l>
          <r>le<s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>le<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>le</l>
          <r>le<s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>let</l>
          <r>le<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="må/tte__vbmod">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tte</l>
          <r>tte<s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>tte<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tte</l>
          <r>tte<s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ttet</l>
          <r>tte<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  </pardefs>

    <e lm="skrige"><i>skr</i><par n="skr/ige__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="finde"><i>f</i><par n="f/inde__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="vinde"><i>v</i><par n="f/inde__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="svinde"><i>sv</i><par n="f/inde__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="forsvinde"><i>forsv</i><par n="f/inde__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="skille"><i>skil</i><par n="skil/le__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kunne"><i>k</i><par n="k/unne__vbmod"/></e>
    <e lm="måtte"><i>må</i><par n="må/tte__vbmod"/></e>
    <e lm="skulle"><i>sk</i><par n="sk/ulle__vbmod"/></e>
    <e lm="ville"><i>vil</i><par n="vil/le__vbmod"/></e>
